South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5472.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-3-14930(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The department may issue the following special license plates reflective of exemplary service awards for private passenger vehicles and motorcycles to the individuals specified by the following license plate categories: (1) Gold Star Family: available to immediate family members (spouse, parent, children, or siblings) (2) Gold Star Family Personalized: available to immediate family members (spouse, parent, children, or siblings) (3) Prisoner of War: available to the award recipient and spouse (4) Purple Heart: available to the award recipient (5) Purple Heart Wheelchair: available to the award recipient (6) In Memoriam-Armed Forces Surviving Spouse: available to the surviving spouse of a military veteran. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----